District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.09

Civil penalties.

(a)

(1)

An owner of a single-family residence who fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter shall be assessed a civil penalty of $100 for each violation.

(2)

An owner of a building containing 2, 3, or 4 dwelling or rooming units who fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter shall be assessed a civil fine of $200 for each violation.

(3)

An owner of a building containing 5 or more dwelling units or any hotel, motel, hospital, nursing home, or residential custodial care facility unit who fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter shall be assessed a civil penalty of $300 for each violation.

(b)

For the purpose of this section, each day a dwelling unit, hotel, motel, hospital, nursing home, or residential custodial care facility fails to comply with this subchapter shall constitute a separate violation.

(c)

(1)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(2)

After a 45-day period of Council review, the Mayor shall issue the procedures described in paragraph (1) of this subsection pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, provided that the Council of the District of Columbia does not disapprove the rules, by resolution, within 45 days of their submission to the Council, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days during which the Council is in recess.

(d)

To enforce this subchapter, the Mayor may seek either the civil penalties in this section or the criminal penalties in § 2104 of The Housing Code of the District of Columbia [14 DCMR § 102] or § 6-1406(a) and (b), but the Mayor shall not seek both the civil penalties and the criminal penalties to enforce a related series of violations.

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 9a
as added Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-139, § 2, 31 DCR 5751
Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 13(e), 34 DCR 1072
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 19, 36 DCR 492
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 29, 38 DCR 314
1981 Ed., § 5-537.
“Section 2104 of The Housing Code of the District of Columbia,” referred to in subsection (d) of this section, is classified to 14 DCMR § 102.1.